src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON TRIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:trive    # ;
            +V+Imp:triv     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:triver   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trives   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:treiv    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:trev     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:trevet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:trivende # ;
LEXICON TRYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:tryte    # ;
              +V+Imp:tryt     # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:tryter   # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trytes   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:trøt     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:trøyt    # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:trytet   # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:trytende # ;
LEXICON TRÅ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:trå     # ;
            +V+Imp:trå     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:trår    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trås    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:tro     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:trådde  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:trådte  # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:trådd   # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:trådt   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:trående # ;
LEXICON TVINGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:tvinge    # ;
          +V+Imp:tving     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:tvinger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tvinges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:tvang     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:tvunget   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:tvingende # ;
LEXICON TYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:tyte    # ;
              +V+Imp:tyt     # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:tyter   # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tytes   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:tøt     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:tøyt    # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:tytt    # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:tytende # ;
LEXICON TØRRE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:tørre  # ;
            +V+Imp:tør    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:tør    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tørres # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:torde  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:turde  # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:tort   # ;
LEXICON VEIE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:veie    # ;
            +V+Imp:vei     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:veier   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:veies   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:veide   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:vog     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:veid    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:veiende # ;
LEXICON VELGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:velge    # ;
          +V+Imp:velg     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:velger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:velges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:valgte   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:valgt    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:velgende # ;
!LEXICON VEVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!            +V+Inf:veve    # ;
!            +V+Imp:vev     # ;
!        +V+Ind+Prs:vever   # ;
!   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:veves   # ;
!        +V+Ind+Prt:vevde   # ;
! +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:vov     # ;
!         +V+PrfPrc:vevd    # ;
!         +V+PrsPrc:vevende # ;
LEXICON VIKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:vike    # ;
            +V+Imp:vik     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:viker   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vikes   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:veik    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:vek     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:veket   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:vikende # ;
LEXICON VILLE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:ville  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:vil    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:ville  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:villet # ;
LEXICON VINDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:vinde    # ;
          +V+Imp:vind     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:vinder   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vindes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:vindet   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:vindet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:vindende # ;
LEXICON VINNE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:vinne    # ;
          +V+Imp:vinn     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:vinner   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vinnes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:vant     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:vunnet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:vinnende # ;
LEXICON VITE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:vite    # ;
            +V+Imp:vit     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:veit    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Use/NG:vet     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:visste  # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:visst   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:vitende # ;
LEXICON VRI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:vri     # ;
            +V+Imp:vri     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:vrir    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vris    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:vrei    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:vridde  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:vred    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:vridd   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:vriende # ;
LEXICON VÆRE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:være     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:er       # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:var      # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:vært     # ;
  +V+PrsPrc:værende  # ;
     +V+Imp:vær      # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:vært     # ;
LEXICON UNNVÆRE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:være     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:værer    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:var      # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:vært     # ;
  +V+PrsPrc:værende  # ;
     +V+Imp:vær      # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:vært     # ;
LEXICON XREKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@** = brekke, overrekke, radbrekk, rekke
          +V+Inf:rekke  #          ;
          +V+Imp:rekk   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:rekker #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:rekkes #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:rekkes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:rakk   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:rukket #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:rekk   prsptcsuff ;
