src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
avtvinge:av TVINGE ;
avvike:av VIKE ;
brekke:b XREKKE ;
gjenvelge:gjen VELGE ;
gjenvinne:gjen VINNE ;
overrekke:over XREKKE ;
overvinne:over VINNE ;
overvære:over UNNVÆRE ;
påtvinge:på TVINGE ;
radbrekke:radb XREKKE ;
rekke: XREKKE ; ! rekke
tiltvinge:til TVINGE ;
trive: TRIVE ;
tryte: TRYTE ; ! truleg feil i bokmålsordboka her. Sjekk opp når dei har oppdatert.
trå: TRÅ ;
tvinge: TVINGE ;
tyte: TYTE ;
tørre: TØRRE ;
unnvike:unn VIKE ;
unnvære:unn UNNVÆRE ;
veie: VEIE ;
velge: VELGE ;
vike: VIKE ;
ville: VILLE ;
vinde: VINDE ;
vinne: VINNE ;
vite: VITE ;
vri: VRI ;
være: VÆRE ;
